Utah statutes.
62A-2-119.   Adoption of inspections, examinations, and studies.

The office may adopt an inspection, examination, or study conducted by a public or private entity, as identified by rule, to determine whether a licensee has complied with a licensing requirement imposed by virtue of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 358, 1998 General Session

